Maryland, session 2026, HB1545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–455.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1545*

HOUSE BILL 1545
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE FREDERICK COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION.
(3) “INCIDENT” MEANS THE FOLLOWING BEHAVIORS, SUSPECTED BY
A TEACHER, AN AIDE, A PARENT, OR A GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT:
(I) BULLYING;
(II) ABUSE;
(III) NEGLECT OF A STUDENT; OR
(IV) HARM TO AN EMPLOYEE OR A STUDENT BY AN EMPLOYEE
OR ANOTHER STUDENT.
(4) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE FREDERICK COUNTY SPECIAL
EDUCATION VIDEO AND AUDIO RECORDING PROGRAM.
(5) “SPECIAL EDUCATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–401 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(6) “SPECIALIZED INSTRUCTIONAL SETTING” MEANS ANY SPACE
WHERE STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES RECEIVE SPECIALIZED SERVICES OR CARE
FOR AT LEAST 50% OF THE INSTRUCTIONAL DAY, INCLUDING:
(I) “EXPRESSIONS” CLASSROOMS;
(II) “LEARNING FOR LIFE” CLASSROOMS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ENVIRONMENT DESIGNATED FOR SPECIALIZED
DISABILITY SUPPORT.
(7) “UNBIASED THIRD PARTY” MEANS:
(I) A DESIGNATED REVIEWER WITHIN THE FREDERICK
COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS DEPARTMENT OF SAFETY AND EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT; OR
(II) AN EXTERNAL ENTITY NOT DIRECTLY ASSIGNED TO THE
SCHOOL WHERE A VIDEO OR AUDIO RECORDING ORIGINATED.

HOUSE BILL 1545 3
(B) (1) THERE IS A FREDERICK COUNTY SPECIAL EDUCATION VIDEO
AND AUDIO RECORDING PROGRAM.
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE ADMINISTERED BY THE BOARD.
(C) (1) (I) THE BOARD SHALL INSTALL VIDEO RECORDING DEVICES IN
ALL SPECIALIZED INSTRUCTIONAL SETTINGS THAT MONITOR ALL AREAS OF THE
SPECIALIZED INSTRUCTIONAL SETTING.
(II) A VIDEO RECORDING DEVICE INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT RECORD INSIDE BATHROOM AREAS OR IN AREAS
THAT STUDENTS USE TO CHANGE CLOTHING.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL INSTALL AND MAINTAIN AUDIO RECORDING
DEVICES IN:
(I) RESTROOMS;
(II) AREAS THAT STUDENTS USE TO CHANGE CLOTHING; AND
(III) PLACES OF PHYSICAL CARE ATTACHED TO RESTROOMS AND
AREAS THAT STUDENTS USE TO CHANGE CLOTHING.
(3) THE FREDERICK COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS DEPARTMENT OF
SAFETY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT SHALL OPERATE AND MAINTAIN THE
VIDEO AND AUDIO RECORDING DEVICES INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION.
(4) AN UNBIASED THIRD PARTY SHALL BE THE CUSTODIAN OF ALL
VIDEO AND AUDIO RECORDINGS.
(5) FREDERICK COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM PERSONNEL MAY
NOT BE A POINT OF CONTACT OR PRIMARY REVIEWER OF VIDEO OR AUDIO
RECORDINGS.
(6) IF A PERSON DISCOVERS THAT THE OPERATION OF A VIDEO OR
AUDIO RECORDING DEVICE HAS BEEN INTERRUPTED, THE PERSON SHALL SUBMIT A
WRITTEN REPORT TO THE UNBIASED THIRD PARTY AND THE BOARD THAT INCLUDES
A DESCRIPTION OF:
(I) HOW THE INTERRUPTION WAS DISCOVERED AND THE
LENGTH OF THE INTERRUPTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1545
(II) THE REASON FOR THE INTERRUPTION, IF KNOWN.
(D) (1) THE BOARD SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE USE OF A VIDEO AND
AUDIO RECORDING DEVICE:
1. TO THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF EACH
STUDENT SUBJECT TO A RECORDING MADE BY A VIDEO OR AUDIO RECORDING
DEVICE AT LEAST 10 DAYS BEFORE ACTIVATING THE DEVICE; AND
2. IN THE STUDENT HANDBOOK; AND
(II) POST A SIGN IN A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION OUTSIDE EACH
RESTROOM WHERE AN AUDIO RECORDING DEVICE IS USED.
(2) (I) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN MAY REQUEST THAT THE
CHILD OF THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN BE EXEMPT FROM AUDIO RECORDINGS
IN THE AREAS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN REQUESTING AN
EXEMPTION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL:
1. DOCUMENT THE REQUEST IN THE STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR 504 PLAN; AND
2. HAVE THE OPPORTUNITY TO DISCUSS ALTERNATIVE
ARRANGEMENTS FOR THE STUDENT’S CARE.
(E) (1) VIDEO AND AUDIO RECORDINGS MAY NOT BE LIVE–STREAMED.
(2) AN UNBIASED THIRD PARTY SHALL REVIEW AT LEAST 15 MINUTES
OF VIDEO AND AUDIO RECORDINGS FROM EACH AREA SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION
(C)(1) AND (2) OF THIS SECTION AT LEAST EVERY 90 CALENDAR DAYS.
(3) WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF AN INCIDENT, THE BOARD
MAY AUTHORIZE THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS TO REVIEW THE VIDEO OR AUDIO
RECORDING:
(I) AN EMPLOYEE OF THE FREDERICK COUNTY PUBLIC
SCHOOL SYSTEM;

HOUSE BILL 1545 5
(II) THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT WHO IS
THE SUBJECT OF THE INCIDENT;
(III) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER; OR
(IV) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES.
(4) THE BOARD SHALL ENSURE THAT VIDEO AND AUDIO RECORDINGS
MADE UNDER THIS SECTION COMPLY WITH FEDERAL PRIVACY LAWS.
(F) (1) THE BOARD MAY NOT USE VIDEO OR AUDIO RECORDINGS MADE
UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) FOR TEACHER EVALUATIONS; OR
(II) TO DOCUMENT A STUDENT IN VIOLATION OF A RULE OR
DISCIPLINARY CODE NOT RELATED TO THE INCIDENT, UNLESS THE BOARD
DETERMINES THAT THE RECORDING CAPTURES A SEPARATE INCIDENT THAT
REQUIRES A SEPARATE INVESTIGATION.
(2) RECORDINGS MADE UNDER THIS SECTION ARE CONFIDENTIAL
AND MAY NOT BE USED FOR ANY PURPOSE NOT SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION.
(G) (1) THE FREDERICK COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS DEPARTMENT OF
SAFETY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT SHALL RETAIN ALL RECORDINGS MADE
UNDER THIS SECTION FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF THE RECORDING.
(2) IF A PARTY REQUESTS A REVIEW OF A RECORDING UNDER
SUBSECTION (E)(3) OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL PRESERVE THE
RECORDING FOR 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE REQUEST AND UNTIL ALL LEGAL
AND ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS ARE COMPLETE.
(3) ALL RECORDINGS MADE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE STORED
ON A SECURE, CLOSED NETWORK MANAGED BY THE BOARD.
(H) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2029, THE BOARD SHALL INSTALL
AT LEAST ONE VIDEO AND AUDIO RECORDING DEVICE IN ALL SPECIALIZED
INSTRUCTIONAL SETTINGS.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2030, THE BOARD SHALL INSTALL VIDEO
AND AUDIO RECORDING DEVICES IN CLASSROOMS THAT HAVE STUDENTS WHO ARE
PART OF:

HOUSE BILL 1545
(I) THE RESPONSIVE INTERVENTIONS FOR STUDENT
EXCELLENCE (RISE) PROGRAM; AND
(II) THE PYRAMID PROGRAM.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2031, THE BOARD SHALL COMPLETE
INSTALLATION OF VIDEO AND AUDIO RECORDING DEVICES.
(I) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2032, EACH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY SHALL
EVALUATE THE PROGRAM AND SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE BOARD AND THE
DEPARTMENT ON THE SCHOOL’S PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING PROGRAM GOALS.
8–401.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Special education” means specially designed instruction, at no cost to
parents, to meet the unique needs of a child with a disability, including:
(i) Instruction in the classroom, in the home, in hospitals and
institutions, and in other settings; and
(ii) Instruction in physical education.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.